Hawaii statutes.
[§672B-16] Duty to cooperate; assessment of
costs and fees. [(a)] It shall be the duty of every person who files a
claim with the design claim conciliation panel, every design professional
against whom the claim is made, and every insurance carrier or other person
providing professional tort liability insurance for the design professional, to
cooperate with the design claim conciliation panel for the purpose of achieving
a prompt, fair, and just disposition or settlement of the claim; provided that
cooperation shall not prejudice the substantive rights of those persons.

[(b)] Any party may apply to the panel to have
the costs of the action assessed against any party for failure to cooperate
with the panel. The panel may award costs, or a portion thereof, including
attorney's fees, witness fees, including those of expert witnesses, filing
fees, and costs of the design claim conciliation panel hearing to the party
applying therefor.

[(c)] In determining whether any person has
failed to cooperate in good faith, the panel shall consider, but is not limited
to, the following:

(1) The attendance of the persons at the hearing of
the design claim conciliation panel;

(2) The extent to which representatives of parties
and counsel representing parties came to panel hearings with knowledge of the
claims and defenses and authority to negotiate a settlement or other
disposition of the claim;

(3) The testimony of members of the panel as to the
facts of the person's participation in the panel hearing;

(4) The extent of the person's cooperation in
providing the panel with documents and testimony called for by the panel;

(5) The reasons advanced by the person so charged for
not fully cooperating or negotiating; and

(6) The failure of the person to submit any required
fees to the department, as required by this chapter.

[(d)] The party against whom costs are awarded
may appeal the award to the circuit court. The court may affirm or remand the
case with instructions for further proceedings, or it may reverse or modify the
award if the substantial rights of the petitioners may have been prejudiced
because the award is characterized as an abuse of discretion. [L 2007, c 207,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next